Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 3.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20108-112
Director of Banking
and Finance; records required; list of borrowers; disclosures prohibited;
confidential records.

(1) The director shall keep,
as records of his or her office, proper books showing all acts, matters, and
things done under the jurisdiction of the department. Neither the director
nor anyone connected with the department shall in any instance disclose the
name of any depositor or debtor of any financial institution or other entity
regulated by the department or the amount of his or her deposit or debt to
anyone, except insofar as may be necessary in the performance of his or her
official duty, except that the department may maintain a record of borrowers
from the financial institutions in this state and may give information concerning
the total liabilities of any such borrowers to any financial institution owning
obligations of such borrowers.

(2) Examination reports, investigation reports, and documents
and information relating to such reports are confidential records of the department
and may be released or disclosed only (a) insofar as is necessary in the performance
of the official duty of the department or (b) pursuant to a properly issued
subpoena to the department and
upon entry of a protective order from a court of competent jurisdiction to
protect and keep confidential the names of borrowers or depositors or to protect
the public interest.

(3) Examination reports, investigation
reports, and documents and information relating to such reports remain confidential
records of the department, even if such examination reports, investigation
reports, and documents and information relating to such reports are transmitted
to a financial institution or other entity regulated by the department which
is the subject of such reports or documents and information, and may not be
otherwise released or disclosed by any such financial institution or other
entity regulated by the department.

(4) The restrictions listed in subsections
(2) and (3) of this section shall also apply to any representative or agent
of the financial institution or other entity regulated by the department.

(5) If examination reports,
investigation reports, or documents and information relating to such reports
are subpoenaed from the department, the party issuing the subpoena shall give
notice of the issuance of such subpoena at least three business days in advance
of the entry of a protective order to the financial institution or other entity regulated by the department which
is the subject of such reports or documents and information, unless the financial
institution or other entity
regulated by the department is already a party to the underlying
proceeding or unless such notice is otherwise prohibited by law or by court
order.

Laws 1923, c. 191, § 35, p. 457;

Laws 1929, c. 38, § 18, p. 166;

C.S.1929, § 8-119;

Laws 1933, c. 18, § 14, p. 142;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 8-119;

R.S.1943, § 8-116;

Laws 1963, c. 29, § 12, p. 138;

Laws 1987, LB 2, § 1;

Laws 1996, LB 1053, § 3;

Laws 1997, LB 137, § 2;

Laws 1999, LB 396, § 6;

Laws 2009, LB327, § 3.